Indiana, session 2026, HB1293.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-13-2-197.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 197.7. "Vulnerable road user"
refers to any of the following:
(1) A first responder.
(2) An individual engaged in road work along a highway or
street.
(3) An individual operating a farm tractor, farm wagon, or
farm implement on a highway or street.
(4) A tow truck operator or stationary recovery vehicle
operator.
(5) A pedestrian.
(6) An individual lawfully operating a bicycle or Class 1, Class
2, or Class 3 electric bicycle on a highway or street.
SECTION 2. IC 9-30-4-6.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2024,
SECTION 44, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.1. (a) The bureau shall suspend or revoke the
2026 IN 1293—LS 6311/DI 137


current driver's license or driving privileges of an individual who is
convicted of any of the following:
(1) Manslaughter or reckless homicide resulting from the
operation of a motor vehicle.
(2) Knowingly making a false application, or committing perjury
with respect to an application made, under:
(A) this chapter; or
(B) any other law requiring the registration of motor vehicles
or regulating motor vehicle operation on highways.
(3) Three (3) charges of criminal recklessness involving the use
of a motor vehicle within the preceding twelve (12) months.
(4) Failure to stop and give information or assistance or failure to
stop and disclose the individual's identity at the scene of an
accident that has resulted in death, personal injury, or property
damage in excess of two hundred dollars ($200).
(5) A moving traffic offense that causes the death of a
vulnerable road user, except for an offense under IC 9-30-5.
(b) The bureau shall suspend a driver's license or driving privileges
of an individual upon conviction in another jurisdiction for the
following:
(1) Manslaughter or reckless homicide resulting from the
operation of a motor vehicle.
(2) Knowingly making a false application, or committing perjury
with respect to an application made, under:
(A) this chapter; or
(B) any other law requiring the registration of motor vehicles
or regulating motor vehicle operation on highways.
(3) Three (3) charges of criminal recklessness involving the use
of a motor vehicle within the preceding twelve (12) months.
(4) Failure to stop and give information or assistance or failure to
stop and disclose the individual's identity at the scene of an
accident that has resulted in death, personal injury, or property
damage in excess of two hundred dollars ($200).
However, if property damage under subdivision (4) is equal to or less
than two hundred dollars ($200), the bureau may determine whether
the driver's license or driving privileges shall be suspended or revoked.
(c) An individual whose driving privileges are suspended under this
chapter is eligible for specialized driving privileges under IC 9-30-16.
(d) A suspension or revocation remains in effect and a new or
renewal license may not be issued to the individual as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2), for six (6) months after
the date of conviction or on the date on which the individual is
2026 IN 1293—LS 6311/DI 137


otherwise eligible for a license, whichever is later.
(2) Upon conviction of an offense described in subsection (a)(1),
(a)(4), (a)(5), (b)(1), or (b)(4), when the accident has resulted in
death, for a fixed period of at least two (2) years and not more
than five (5) years, to be fixed by the bureau based upon
recommendation of the court entering a conviction. A new or
reinstated driver's license or driving privileges may not be issued
to the individual unless that individual, within the three (3) years
following the expiration of the suspension or revocation, gives
and maintains in force at all times during the effective period of
a new or reinstated license proof of financial responsibility in the
future in the manner specified in this chapter. However, the
liability of the insurance carrier under a motor vehicle liability
policy that is furnished for proof of financial responsibility in the
future as set out in this chapter becomes absolute whenever loss
or damage covered by the policy occurs, and the satisfaction by
the insured of a final judgment for loss or damage is not a
condition precedent to the right or obligation of the carrier to
make payment on account of loss or damage, but the insurance
carrier has the right to settle a claim covered by the policy. If the
settlement is made in good faith, the amount must be deducted
from the limits of liability specified in the policy. A policy may
not be canceled or annulled with respect to a loss or damage by an
agreement between the carrier and the insured after the insured
has become responsible for the loss or damage, and a cancellation
or annulment is void. The policy may provide that the insured or
any other person covered by the policy shall reimburse the
insurance carrier for payment made on account of any loss or
damage claim or suit involving a breach of the terms, provisions,
or conditions of the policy. If the policy provides for limits that
exceed the limits specified in this chapter, the insurance carrier
may plead against any plaintiff, with respect to the amount of the
excess limits of liability, any defenses that the carrier may be
entitled to plead against the insured. The policy may further
provide for prorating of the insurance with other applicable valid
and collectible insurance. An action does not lie against the
insurance carrier by or on behalf of any claimant under the policy
until a final judgment has been obtained after actual trial by or on
behalf of any claimant under the policy.
(e) The bureau may take action as required in this section upon
receiving satisfactory evidence of a conviction of an individual in
another state.
2026 IN 1293—LS 6311/DI 137


(f) A suspension or revocation under this section or IC 9-30-13-0.5
stands pending appeal of the conviction to a higher court and may be
set aside or modified only upon the receipt by the bureau of the
certificate of the court reversing or modifying the judgment that the
cause has been reversed or modified. However, if the suspension or
revocation follows a conviction in a court of no record in Indiana, the
suspension or revocation is stayed pending appeal of the conviction to
a court of record.
(g) A person aggrieved by an order or act of the bureau under this
section or IC 9-30-13-0.5 may file a petition for a court review.
(h) An entry in the driving record of a defendant stating that notice
of suspension or revocation was mailed by the bureau, or sent
electronically if the defendant has indicated a preference for receiving
notices from the bureau electronically, to the defendant constitutes
prima facie evidence that the notice was mailed to the defendant's
address as shown in the records of the bureau.
2026 IN 1293—LS 6311/DI 137